Massachusetts, session 194th, H2749.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
In the town of Plymouth, the position of Harbormaster, and the town of Plymouth 
Harbormaster Department employees who have statutory powers of law enforcement, shall be 
Group 4 employees pursuant to M.G.L. c. 32, § 3(2)(g). Notwithstanding any provision in 
M.G.L. c. 32, §§ 1-28, inclusive to the contrary, all prior creditable service rendered before the 
effective date of this act rendered by the Harbormaster and Harbormaster Department employees 
as of the date of this act will be considered Group 4 service. 
Section 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.